Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1027.01
Identification envelope; verify signature.

The election commissioner or county clerk shall verify the signature on each identification envelope received in his or her office with the signature on the voter registration records.

Laws 2025, LB521, § 69.